Missouri, session 2026, HB2178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.115, 138.010, 138.060, 138.390, and 138.430, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.115,
138.010, 138.060, 138.390, and 138.430, to read as follows:
137.115. 1. (1) All other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the assessor or the
assessor's deputies in all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis shall annually
make a list of all real and tangible personal property taxable in the assessor's city, county,
town or district.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section and section 137.078,
the assessor shall annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and one-third percent of
its true value in money as of January first of each calendar year.
(3) The assessor shall annually assess all real property, including any new
construction and improvements to real property, and possessory interests in real property at
the percent of its true value in money set in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in
money of any possessory interest in real property in subclass (3), where such real property is
on or lies within the ultimate airport boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as
defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a FAR Part 139 certification and
owned by a political subdivision, shall be the otherwise applicable true value in money of any
such possessory interest in real property, less the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party,
other than the political subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on such
real property completed after January 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2178 2
mentioned possessory interest, regardless of the year in which such costs were incurred or
whether such costs were considered in any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all
real property in the following manner: new assessed values shall be determined as of January
first of each odd-numbered year and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered year, except for new construction
and property improvements which shall be valued as though they had been completed as of
January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The assessor may call at the office, place
of doing business, or residence of each person required by this chapter to list property, and
require the person to make a correct statement of all taxable tangible personal property owned
by the person or under his or her care, charge or management, taxable in the county.
(4) On or before January first of each even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare
and submit a two-year assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and the
state tax commission for their respective approval or modification. The county governing
body shall approve and forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the state tax
commission by February first. If the county governing body fails to forward the plan or its
alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by February first, the assessor's plan shall
be considered approved by the county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to
approve a plan and if the state tax commission and the assessor and the governing body of the
county involved are unable to resolve the differences, in order to receive state cost-share
funds outlined in section 137.750, the county or the assessor shall petition the administrative
hearing commission, by May first, to decide all matters in dispute regarding the assessment
maintenance plan. Upon agreement of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties
proceed with mediation or arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final decision
of the administrative hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in the circuit
court of the county involved.
(5) In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real property or subclass (3) real
property within any county with a charter form of government, or within a city not within a
county, is made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a computer program, the burden
of proof, supported by clear, convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall
be on the assessor at any hearing or appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves
otherwise, there shall be a presumption that the assessment was made by a computer,
computer-assisted method or a computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall not
be limited to, the following:
[(1)] (a) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal of the property by
generally accepted appraisal techniques; and

HCS HB 2178 3
[(2)] (b) The purchase prices from sales of at least three comparable properties and
the address or location thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
that:
[(a)] a. Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the property valuation; and
[(b)] b. Such properties are not more than one mile from the site of the disputed
property, except where no similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such property shall be within five hundred
square feet in size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in age, floor
plan, number of rooms, and other relevant characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City of St. Louis may send personal
property assessment forms through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each constitute separate subclasses
of tangible personal property and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of taxation at
the following percentages of their true value in money:
(1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an unmanufactured condition, one-half of
one percent;
(2) Livestock, twelve percent;
(3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
(4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration as and are registered as historic
motor vehicles pursuant to section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five years
old and which are used solely for noncommercial purposes and are operated less than two
hundred hours per year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five percent;
(5) Poultry, twelve percent;
(6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and tools and equipment used in
retooling for the purpose of introducing new product lines or used for making improvements
to existing products by any company which is located in a state enterprise zone and which is
identified by any standard industrial classification number cited in subdivision (7) of section
135.200, twenty-five percent; and
(7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and related solar equipment, components,
materials, and supplies installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy systems, as
described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of section 144.030, that were constructed and
producing solar energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
4. The person listing the property shall enter a true and correct statement of the
property, in a printed blank prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being filled out,
shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to as provided in section 137.155. The list shall
then be delivered to the assessor.

HCS HB 2178 4
5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such subclasses are established in Section 4
(b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016, shall be assessed
at the following percentages of true value:
(a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen percent;
(b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent; and
(c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two percent.
(2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or, if not located within a county,
then the assessor of such city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real property if the use
or purpose of such real property is changed after such property is assessed under the
provisions of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such property shall be reclassified,
he or she shall determine the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage of the
100 tax year that such property was classified in each subclassification.
101 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010, which are actually used as
102 dwelling units shall be assessed at the same percentage of true value as residential real
103 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of assessment of true value for such
104 manufactured homes shall be the same as for residential real property. If the county collector
105 cannot identify or find the manufactured home when attempting to attach the manufactured
106 home for payment of taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county collector may
107 request the county commission to have the manufactured home removed from the tax books,
108 and such request shall be granted within thirty days after the request is made; however, the
109 removal from the tax books does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it is
110 later identified or found. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home located in a
111 manufactured home rental park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
112 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal property. For purposes of this
113 section, a manufactured home located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
114 may be considered real property.
115 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered a parcel for the purpose of
116 reimbursement pursuant to section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to be
117 real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015 and assessed as a realty improvement
118 to the existing real estate parcel.
119 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the assessment of a manufactured
120 home shall be included on the personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
121 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of
122 section 442.015, in which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment of the
123 manufactured home as a realty improvement to the existing real estate parcel shall be
124 included on the real property tax statement of the real estate owner.

HCS HB 2178 5
125 9. The assessor of each county and each city not within a county shall use a nationally
126 recognized automotive trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
127 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book, Edmunds, or other similar
128 publication as the recommended guide of information for determining the true value of motor
129 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax commission shall select and make
130 available to all assessors which publication shall be used. The assessor of each county and
131 each city not within a county shall use the trade-in value published in the current October
132 issue of the publication selected by the state tax commission. The assessor shall not use a
133 value that is greater than the average trade-in value in determining the true value of the motor
134 vehicle without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years
135 old or newer from a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other than average
136 without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for
137 a particular motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use such information or
138 publications that, in the assessor's judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
139 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of less than fifty thousand dollars as
140 of January 1, 2025, the assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount greater
141 than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous year, provided that such motor vehicle
142 was properly assessed in the previous year.
143 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed valuation of any parcel of subclass
144 (1) real property or any parcel of subclass (3) real property by more than fifteen percent
145 since the last assessment, excluding increases due to new construction or improvements, the
146 assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of such property.
147 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to subsection 10 of this section, the
148 assessor shall notify the property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the owner
149 clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
150 inspection is required, the property owner may request that an interior inspection be
151 performed during the physical inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days to
152 notify the assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
153 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection 10 of this section, shall include,
154 but not be limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of all exterior portions of the
155 land and any buildings and improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably and
156 lawfully gain external access, and shall include an observation and review of the interior of
157 any buildings or improvements on the property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant
158 to subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or
159 the like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as required by
160 this section.

HCS HB 2178 6
161 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards as proper form of payment of
162 outstanding property tax or license due. No county or city collector may charge surcharge for
163 payment by credit card which exceeds the fee or surcharge charged by the credit card bank,
164 processor, or issuer for its service. A county or city collector may accept payment by
165 electronic transfers of funds in payment of any tax or license and charge the person making
166 such payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the bank, processor, or issuer of
167 such electronic payment.
168 14. Any county or city not within a county in this state may, by an affirmative vote of
169 the governing body of such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and sections
170 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
171 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house committee
172 substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-
173 second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of the general
174 reassessment, prior to January first of any year. No county or city not within a county
175 shall exercise this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of this section and
176 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first
177 general assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
178 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no.
179 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a year of general
180 reassessment. For the purposes of applying the provisions of this subsection, a political
181 subdivision contained within two or more counties where at least one of such counties has
182 opted out and at least one of such counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate as
183 in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly,
184 second regular session. A governing body of a city not within a county or a county that has
185 opted out under the provisions of this subsection may choose to implement the provisions of
186 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of
187 the ninety-first general assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as modified by
188 house committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill
189 no. 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of general
190 reassessment, by an affirmative vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
191 any year.
192 15. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than twenty-
193 six thousand three hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred inhabitants
194 located in any county that has exercised its authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this
195 section may levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal property only if such
196 city bills and collects its own property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing and

HCS HB 2178 7
197 collection of such separate and differing tax rates. Such separate and differing rates shall not
198 exceed such city's tax rate ceiling.
199 16. Any portion of real property that is available as reserve for strip, surface, or coal
200 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that has not
201 been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be assessed based upon how the real
202 property is currently being used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state tax
203 commission, state agency, or political subdivision responsible for the administration of tax
204 policies shall, in the performance of its duties, make available all books, records, and
205 information requested, except such books, records, and information as are by law declared
206 confidential in nature, including individually identifiable information regarding a specific
207 taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property. For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall
208 mean all real property that is in use or readily available as a reserve for strip, surface, or coal
209 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to others that
210 has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
138.010. 1. Except as otherwise provided by law, in every county in this state there
shall be a county board of equalization consisting of the commissioners of the county
commission, the county assessor as a nonvoting member, the county surveyor, and the county
clerk who shall be secretary of the board without a vote. The county commissioners shall also
appoint two additional members to the board who shall be citizens of the county, but not
officers of the county and, for such additional members appointed after August 28, 2007, not
related to any member of the county board of equalization within the third degree of
consanguinity, who shall have some level of experience as determined by the county
commission as a real estate broker, real estate appraiser, home builder, property developer,
lending officer, or investor in real estate before such member's appointment to the board. The
assessor or a member of the assessor's staff shall be present at all board of equalization
hearings, and shall have the right to present evidence pertaining to any assessment matter
before the board.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, this board shall meet at the
office of the county clerk on the third Monday of July of each year.
3. Upon a finding by the board that it is necessary in order to fairly hear all cases
arising from a general reassessment, the board may begin meeting after July first in any
applicable year to timely consider any appeal or complaint resulting from an evaluation made
during a general reassessment of all taxable real property and possessory interests in the
county.
4. Any cases arising from general reassessment involving property whose
assessed valuation increased at least fifteen percent from the previous assessment, unless
such increase is due to new construction or improvement, that were not heard and acted

HCS HB 2178 8
upon by the board of equalization by September thirtieth in any applicable year shall be
dismissed, the assessor's increased assessed valuation shall be void in its entirety, and
the previous assessed valuation shall be applied to the property in place of the increased
assessed valuation. A dismissal of a case under this section shall not preclude any
taxpayer from an appeal to the state tax commission of his or her assessment within
thirty days of the date of dismissal.
138.060. 1. (1) The county board of equalization shall, in a summary way, determine
all appeals from the valuation of property made by the assessor, and shall correct and adjust
the assessment accordingly. There shall be no presumption that the assessor's valuation is
correct.
(2) In any county with a charter form of government with a population greater than
two hundred eighty thousand inhabitants but less than two hundred eighty-five thousand
inhabitants, in any county with a charter form of government with greater than one million
inhabitants, in any city not within a county, and in any other county for any property whose
assessed valuation increased at least fifteen percent from the previous assessment unless the
increase is due to new construction or improvement, the assessor shall have the burden to
prove that the assessor's valuation does not exceed the true market value of the subject
property. In such county or city, in the event a physical inspection of the subject property is
required by subsection 10 of section 137.115, the assessor shall have the burden to establish
the manner in which the physical inspection was performed and shall have the burden to
prove that the physical inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115. In such
county or city, in the event the assessor fails to provide sufficient evidence to establish that
the physical inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115, the property
owner shall prevail on the appeal as a matter of law, the assessor's increased assessed
valuation shall be void in its entirety, and the previous assessed valuation shall be
applied to the property in place of the increased assessed valuation.
(3) At any hearing before the state tax commission or a court of competent
jurisdiction of an appeal of assessment from a first class charter county or a city not within a
county, the assessor shall not advocate nor present evidence advocating a valuation higher
than that value finally determined by the assessor or the value determined by the board of
equalization, whichever is higher, for that assessment period.
2. The county clerk shall keep an accurate record of the proceedings and orders of the
board, and the assessor shall correct all erroneous assessments, and the clerk shall adjust the
tax book according to the orders of such board and the orders of the state tax commission,
except that in adding or deducting such percent to each tract or parcel of real estate as
required by such board or state tax commission, [he] the clerk shall add or deduct in each

HCS HB 2178 9
case any fractional sum of less than fifty cents, so that the value of any separate tract shall
contain no fractions of a dollar.
3. If a taxpayer submits a written appraisal report prepared by a Missouri
appraiser certified by the Missouri real estate appraisers commission to the board of
equalization at least five days prior to the hearing date scheduled by the board of
equalization to hear the taxpayer's appeal, the value of the property determined in the
appraisal report shall presumptively determine the property's true value in money
unless the assessor produces substantial and persuasive evidence as to why such value
should not be adopted by the board of equalization.
138.390. 1. The state tax commission shall equalize the valuation of real and tangible
personal property among the several counties in the state in the following manner: with the
abstracts of all the taxable property in the several counties of the state and the abstracts of the
sales of real estate in such counties as returned by the respective county clerks and the
assessor of the city of St. Louis, the commission shall classify all real estate situate in cities,
towns, and villages, as town lots, and all other real estate as farming lands, and shall classify
all tangible personal property as follows: banking corporations, railroad corporations, street
railroad corporations, all other corporations, horses, mares and geldings, mules, asses and
jennets, neat cattle, sheep, swine, goats, domesticated small animals and all other livestock,
poultry, power machinery, farm implements, other tangible personal property.
2. The state tax commission shall equalize the valuation of each class or subclass of
property thereof among the respective counties of the state in the following manner:
(1) It shall add to the valuation of each class, subclass, or portion thereof of the
property, real or tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be valued below its real
value in money such amount or percent as will increase the same in each case to its true value;
(2) It shall deduct from the valuation of each class, subclass, or portion thereof of the
property, real or tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be valued above its real
value in money such amount or percent as will reduce the same in each case to its true value.
3. When the state tax commission equalizes the valuation of a class or subclass of
property that results in an increase of more than fifteen percent in a single tax year, such
increase shall be evenly divided between each of the next successive reassessment cycles
in a manner that does not cause any single year increase to exceed fifteen percent.
138.430. 1. Every owner of real property or tangible personal property shall have the
right to appeal from the local boards of equalization to the state tax commission under rules
prescribed by the state tax commission, within the time prescribed in this chapter or thirty
days following the final action of the local board of equalization, whichever date later occurs,
concerning all questions and disputes involving the assessment against such property, the
correct valuation to be placed on such property, the method or formula used in determining

HCS HB 2178 10
the valuation of such property, or the assignment of a discriminatory assessment to such
property. The commission shall investigate all such appeals and shall correct any assessment
or valuation which is shown to be unlawful, unfair, improper, arbitrary or capricious. Any
person aggrieved by the decision of the commission may seek review as provided in chapter
536.
2. In order to investigate such appeals, the commission may inquire of the owner of
the property or of any other party to the appeal regarding any matter or issue relevant to the
valuation, subclassification or assessment of the property. The commission may make its
decision regarding the assessment or valuation of the property based solely upon its inquiry
and any evidence presented by the parties to the commission, or based solely upon evidence
presented by the parties to the commission.
3. Every owner of real property or tangible personal property shall have the right to
appeal to the circuit court of the county in which the collector maintains [his] the collector's
office from the decision of the local board of equalization not later than thirty days after the
final decision of the board of equalization concerning all questions and disputes involving the
exclusion or exemption of such property from assessment or from the tax rolls pursuant to the
Constitution of the United States or the constitution or laws of this state, or of the taxable situs
of such property. The appeal shall be as a trial de novo in the manner prescribed for nonjury
civil proceedings. Upon the timely filing of the appeal, the clerk of the circuit court shall
send to the county collector to whom the taxes on the property involved would be due a notice
that an appeal seeking exemption has been filed, which notice shall contain the name of the
taxpayer, the case number assigned by the court, and the parcel or locator number of the
property being appealed. The notice to the collector shall state that the taxes in dispute are to
be impounded in accordance with subsection 2 of section 139.031.
4. Upon the timely filing of an appeal to the state tax commission as provided in this
section, or the transfer of an appeal to the commission in accordance with subsection 5 of this
section, the commission shall send to the county collector to whom the taxes on the property
involved would be due a notice that an appeal has been filed or transferred as the case may be,
which notice shall contain the name of the taxpayer filing the appeal, the appeal number
assigned by the commission, the parcel or locator number of the property being appealed, the
assessed value by the board of equalization and the assessed value proposed by the taxpayer,
if such values have been provided to the commission when the appeal is filed. The notice to
the collector shall state that the taxes in dispute are to be impounded in accordance with
subsection 2 of section 139.031. Notice to the collector of an appeal filed in an odd-
numbered year shall also serve as notice to the collector to impound taxes for the following
even-numbered year if no decision has been rendered in the appeal. The state tax commission
shall notify the collector once a decision has been rendered in an appeal.

HCS HB 2178 11
5. If the circuit court, after review of the appeal, finds that the appeal is not a proper
subject for the appeal to the circuit court as provided in subsection 3 of this section, it shall
transfer the appeal to the state tax commission for consideration.
6. If an assessor classifies real property under a classification that is contrary to or in
conflict with a determination by the state tax commission or a court of competent jurisdiction
of said property, the taxpayer shall be awarded costs of appeal and reasonable attorney's fees
on a challenge of the assessor's determination.
7. If an assessor appeals the decision of the state tax commission to a court of
competent jurisdiction on any grounds other than overvaluation and the taxpayer is the
prevailing party, the taxpayer shall be awarded costs of appeal and reasonable
attorney's fees, whether paid directly by the taxpayer or paid by an attorney, tax agent,
or other third party.
✔